Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 5. PROTECTION OF CONSUMER INTERESTS

SUBTITLE C. DECEPTIVE, UNFAIR, AND PROHIBITED PRACTICES

CHAPTER 555. FAILURE TO SATISFY JUDGMENT

Sec. 555.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter does not apply to an insurer subject to Chapter 841.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 555.002. REVOCATION OF CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY. If an execution issued on a final judgment rendered against an insurer is not satisfied and discharged before the 31st day after the date of notice of the execution's issuance, the insurer's certificate of authority shall be revoked, and the insurer may not engage in the business of insurance in this state until the execution is satisfied.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2005.